Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF2364.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 5330YH (5) 91 mb/jh H.F. 2364 Section 1. Section 2.10, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 1 following new subsection: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 9. The provisions of this section governing 3 the payment of salaries to members of the general assembly 4 are subject to the suspension and forfeiture requirements of 5 section 257.8, subsection 2A. 6 Sec. 2. Section 257.8, Code 2026, is amended by adding the 7 following new subsection: 8 NEW SUBSECTION . 2A. Failure to timely enact state percents 9 of growth. 10 a. If the state percent of growth and categorical 11 state percent of growth for the subsequent budget year are 12 not enacted within thirty days of the transmission of the 13 governorâs budget as required by February 1 under section 14 8.21 during the regular legislative session beginning in the 15 base year, the payment of salaries to members of the general 16 assembly shall be suspended beginning on the thirty-first day 17 following such transmission and shall remain suspended until 18 legislation is enacted establishing the state percent of growth 19 and categorical state percent of growth for the subsequent 20 budget year. 21 b. Salaries withheld under this subsection are forfeited, 22 and shall not be paid retroactively upon enactment of 23 legislation establishing the state percent of growth and 24 categorical state percent of growth for the subsequent budget 25 year. 26